New York, session 2025-2026, A10692.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 13-0340-h to read as follows: 3 § 13-0340-h. Atlantic bonito (Sarda sarda) and false albacore (Euthynnus 4 alletteratus). 5 The department may, until December thirty-first, two thousand twenty- 6 nine, fix by regulation measures for the management of Atlantic bonito 7 (Sarda sarda) and false albacore (Euthynnus alletteratus) including size 8 limits, catch and possession limits, open and closed seasons, closed 9 areas, restrictions on the manner of taking and landing, requirements 10 for permits and eligibility therefor, recordkeeping requirements, 11 requirements on the amount and type of fishing effort and gear, and 12 requirements relating to transportation, possession and sale, provided 13 that such regulations are no less restrictive than requirements set 14 forth in this chapter and provided further that such regulations are 15 consistent with the compliance requirements of applicable fishery 16 management plans adopted by the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commis- 17 sion and with applicable provisions of fishery management plans adopted 18 pursuant to the Federal Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 19 U.S.C. § 1800 et seq.). 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15232-01-6